Utah statutes.
53A-25b-306.   Programs for deafblind individuals -- State deafblind
education specialist.
(1)  The board shall adopt policies and programs for providing appropriate
educational services to individuals who are deafblind.
(2)  Except as provided in Subsection (4), the board shall designate an
employee of the Utah State Office of Education who holds a deafblind
certification or equivalent training and expertise to:
(a)  act as a resource coordinator for the board on public education programs
designed for individuals who are deafblind;
(b)  facilitate the design and implementation of professional development
programs to assist school districts, charter schools, and the Utah Schools for
the Deaf and the Blind in meeting the educational needs of those who are
deafblind; and
(c)  facilitate the design of and assist with the implementation of one-on-one
intervention programs in school districts, charter schools, and at the Utah
Schools for the Deaf and the Blind for those who are deafblind, serving as a
resource for, or team member of, individual IEP teams.
(3)  The board may authorize and approve the costs of an employee of the Utah
State Office of Education to obtain a deafblind certification or equivalent
training and expertise to qualify for the position described in Subsection
(2).
(4)  The board may contract with a third party for the services required under
Subsection (2).
